District of Columbia statutes.
44-904

Congressional review of system implementation plan.

(a)

The Committee on the District of Columbia of the House of Representatives and the Committee on Labor and Human Resources and the Committee on Governmental Affairs of the Senate shall review the preliminary system implementation plan transmitted by the Mayor pursuant to § 44-903 to determine the extent of its compliance with the provisions of § 44-901(b) and § 44-903, and transmit written recommendations regarding any revisions to the preliminary plan to the Mayor not later than 60 days after receipt of such plan.

(b)

The Committee on the District of Columbia of the House of Representatives and the Committee on Labor and Human Resources and the Committee on Governmental Affairs of the Senate shall, within 90 days of submission of the final system implementation plan by the Mayor pursuant to § 44-903, review such plan to determine the extent to which it is in compliance with the provisions of § 44-901(b) and § 44-903.

History

Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-624.

Effective Dates

For effective date of this subchapter, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 442901.